District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Climatizing Our Overheated Living Spaces Regulation Amendment Act
of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 6 of Subtitle G of Title 12 of the District of Columbia Municipal
Regulations is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection 602.3 (12G DCMR § 602.3) is amended to read as follows:
“602.3. Heat Supply. Every owner and operator of any building who rents, leases or lets
one or more dwelling units, or rooming units, dormitory or guestrooms on terms, either
expressed or implied, to furnish heat to the occupants thereof shall supply sufficient heat during a
period starting no later than October 15 and ending no earlier than April 15 to maintain a
temperature of not less than 68ºF (20ºC) in all habitable rooms, bathrooms and toilet rooms;
except that, when the outdoor temperature is below the winter outdoor design temperature for the


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
District, maintenance of the minimum room temperature shall not be required provided that the
heating system is operating at its full capacity. The winter outdoor design temperature for the
District of Columbia as set by the current District of Columbia Residential Code, Chapter 3
Design Criteria.”.
(b) Section 608 (12G DCMR § 608) is amended to read as follows:
“608 Residential Air Conditioning and Heating Supply
“608.1 Air Conditioning. Every owner or operator of a housing business or dormitory,
who provides air conditioning as a service either through individual air conditioning units or a
central air conditioning system, shall maintain each such air conditioning unit or system in a safe
and good working condition so that it is capable of providing, during a period starting no later
than May 1 and ending no earlier than October 1, an inside temperature, in the rooms it is
intended to serve, equal to the greater of: (a) 78 ºF (26 ºC); or (b) at least 15 ºF (9 ºC) less than
the outside temperature.
“608.2 Heat Supply. Every owner or operator of a building who rents, leases, or lets one
or more dwelling units, rooming units, dormitory rooms, or guestrooms, shall provide heating
services pursuant to Section 602 of this chapter. Any owner or operator who does not provide air
conditioning as a service shall furnish heating services through a period starting no later than
October 15 and ending no earlier than April 15.
“608.3 Tenant control of internal temperature. A owner or operator of building who
provides air conditioning as a service and heating to a tenant and where air conditioning and


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
heating is under the control of the tenant shall maintain the central heating systems and central
air conditioning system or individual air conditioning units in safe and good working condition
and capable of maintaining, throughout the year, a room temperature of no less than 68°F (20°C)
and, when air conditioning is operating, no more than the greater of (a) 78ºF (26ºC); or, (b) at
least 15 ºF (9ºC) less than the outside temperature.
“608.4. Two-pipe system turnover. In a building with a two-pipe system, air conditioning
and heat provision may be transitioned at the discretion of a building owner or manager,
provided that air conditioning is available to tenants no later than May 1, and heat is available to
no later than October 15.
“608.5. Inspection of air conditioning equipment by qualified persons. The owner of a
structure containing two or more units served by central or shared air conditioning equipment, or
wall-mounted air conditioning units (not including window air conditioning units), shall cause
the air conditioning equipment to be inspected by a qualified person annually. A copy of current
inspection and service reports shall be available for public inspection on site in the office of the
building operator.
Exception: If the building operator does not have an on-site office, the reports shall be
made available for inspection:
1. By posting the reports in an on-site location accessible to all building residents; or
2. By mailing or delivering a copy of the reports to each unit; or


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
3. By mailing or delivering a notice to each unit identifying a location within the District
of Columbia where the reports are available for public inspection during normal business
hours.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of May 1, 2027.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).